Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 5

Reduction of Prison Overcrowding

41-1-501. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the board of parole;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of correction;

“Designated capacity” means the number of adult male and female inmates who may be confined in all state correctional facilities under humane and constitutional conditions, as determined by the commissioner;

“In-house population” means the total number of adult male or female inmates physically present within all state correctional facilities on a given day;

“Parole” means the release of an inmate to the community by the board of parole prior to the expiration of the inmate's term, subject to conditions imposed by the board and to its supervision, or where a court or other authority has issued a warrant against the prisoner and the board in its discretion has released the prisoner to answer the warrant of the court or authority;

“Prisoner” means an inmate confined in a state correctional facility or a felony offender confined in a local jail or workhouse who is serving a sentence of one (1) or more years; and

“Relevant designated capacity” means the capacity of the state correctional facilities housing all adult male or all adult female inmates, or both, under the conditions set forth in the definition of “designated capacity.”

For purposes of this part, and with reference to prisoners sentenced for offenses occurring prior to July 1, 1982, references to release eligibility dates are deemed references to a prisoner's earliest release date.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 19; 1989, ch. 227, § 58; 1998, ch. 1049, § 55.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 727, § 1 amended § 4-3-104, which concerns name changes of departments and divisions, to provide that references to the board of probation and parole, formerly referred to in this section, are deemed references to the board of parole.

Cross-References. Multiple rapist or child rapist; sentencing, release and parole, § 39-13-523.

Probation, paroles and pardons, title 40, ch. 28.

Release eligibility status, calculations, § 40-35-501.

41-1-502. Report to general assembly on designated capacities and in-house populations — Construction of part.

On February 1 of each year, or on more frequent occasions during periods of construction or when there is a change in designated capacity, the commissioner shall inform the speakers of the senate and house of representatives, the chairs of the judiciary and state and local government committees of the senate, the chair of the judiciary committee of the house of representatives, and the chair of the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections as to the relevant designated capacity and in-house population of all adult male and all adult female correctional facilities administered by the department and the reasons for any changes in the designated capacities.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to affect the authority of the general assembly to appropriate funds for the construction, renovation or alteration of correctional facilities administered by the department.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to affect the authority of the state building commission to review, approve and oversee projects relating to the construction, renovation or alteration of correctional facilities administered by the department.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 19; 2013, ch. 236, § 85; 2019, ch. 345, § 62.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “the chairs of the judiciary and state and local government committees of the senate, the chair of the judiciary committee of the house of representatives, and the chair of the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections” for “the chairs of the judiciary and state and local government committees of the senate and the criminal justice and state government committees of the house of representatives”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

41-1-503. Certification of excess population — Declaration of prison overcrowding emergency.

When the commissioner determines that the in-house population has for thirty (30) consecutive days exceeded ninety-five percent (95%) of the relevant designated capacity, or has reasonable grounds to believe that within thirty (30) days the in-house population will, for at least thirty (30) consecutive days, exceed ninety-five percent (95%) of the relevant designated capacity, the commissioner shall so certify to the governor.

Upon receiving the certification from the commissioner, the governor may declare that a state of overcrowding emergency exists. If the governor so declares, the governor shall immediately notify the state and local government committee of the senate, the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections, and the attorney general and reporter that a state of prison overcrowding exists and the approximate number of inmates in the system that is in excess of ninety percent (90%) of the relevant designated capacity.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 19; 2011, ch. 410, § 2(b); 2013, ch. 236, § 64; 2019, ch. 345, § 63.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections” for “state government committee of the house of representatives” in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

41-1-504. Governor's powers to reduce overcrowding.

Upon declaring that an overcrowding emergency exists, the governor shall invoke one (1) or both of the following powers to reduce overcrowding:

Direct the board, in writing, to reduce the release eligibility dates of all male or female inmates, or both, excluding any inmate convicted by a court of escape, by a percentage sufficient to enable the board to consider immediately and to release on supervised parole enough inmates to reduce the in-house population of appropriate state correctional facilities to ninety percent (90%) of the relevant designated capacity. The department of correction shall be responsible for calculating the new release eligibility date of any felony offender sentenced to confinement for one (1) or more years in the department or a county jail or workhouse;

Direct the commissioner, in writing, to notify all state judges and sheriffs that the commitment to the department of felons who have been on bail prior to their convictions shall be stayed or otherwise delayed until up to sixty (60) days after the in-house population of appropriate correctional facilities has been reduced to ninety percent (90%) of the relevant designated capacity either through normal release, contract sentencing, the power granted in subdivision (a)(1) or all of these methods.

The directive of the governor invoking the power granted pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) shall include the approximate number of inmates who must be released to reach ninety percent (90%) of the relevant designated capacity as well as any restrictions the governor may wish to impose regarding which inmates or types of inmates are not eligible for release and may not be considered by the board. There shall be no limits on the number or types of restrictions the governor may impose on early release eligibility as long as a sufficient number of inmates are eligible for consideration to reduce the in-house population of appropriate state correctional facilities to ninety percent (90%) of the relevant designated capacity.

Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, the governor does not have the authority to make inmates who have been convicted of a second or subsequent violation of § 39-13-502 or § 39-13-503 eligible for release under this part, nor shall the board have the authority to consider these inmates.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 19; 1989, ch. 227, § 59; 1991, ch. 204, § 2; 1993, ch. 209, § 1.

Cross-References. Contract sentencing, title 40, ch. 34.

Law Reviews.

Life-Without-Parole: An Alternative to Death or Not Much of a Life at All?, 43 Vand. L. Rev. 529 (1990).

41-1-505. Selection and release of inmates by board — Powers of board.

Upon receipt of the written directive transmitted by the governor pursuant to § 41-1-504(a)(1) and any restrictions that may be imposed by the governor, the board shall promptly select and release on supervised parole a sufficient number of inmates to comply with the directive of the governor. Upon the board's release of the inmates and the attainment of ninety percent (90%) of the relevant designated capacity, the release eligibility dates of the inmates remaining within the department of correction shall revert automatically to the dates in existence prior to their reductions pursuant to this subsection (a). It is the responsibility of the commissioner to announce the attainment of ninety percent (90%) of the relevant designated capacity to the board and the governor as soon as it occurs.

When acting pursuant to §§ 41-1-503 — 41-1-508, the board is empowered to:

Establish criteria by which prisoners shall be considered and selected for release;

Impose conditions or limitations upon the parole as it deems necessary; and

Authorize individual board members or parole hearing officers to conduct hearings, take testimony and make written proposed findings of fact and recommendations regarding the granting or denial of parole. The recommendations shall be adopted, modified or rejected by the concurrence of three (3) board members.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 19; 1989, ch. 227, §§ 60, 61.

Cross-References. Probation, paroles and pardons, title 40, ch. 28.

Law Reviews.

Life-Without-Parole: An Alternative to Death or Not Much of a Life at All?, 43 Vand. L. Rev. 529 (1990).

41-1-506. Delayed commitment of felons to department of correction.

The directive invoking the power granted pursuant to § 41-1-504(a)(2) shall include any conditions the governor may wish to impose as to which inmates or types of inmates will immediately be accepted by the department of correction or which inmates or types of inmates will be subject to the delayed intake directive, or both. The commissioner shall transmit any conditions imposed by the governor to the judges and sheriffs in the notification that intake to the department has been delayed.

Notwithstanding this part, the governor shall not have the authority to direct that the commitment of an inmate be delayed any longer than six (6) months from the date of sentencing or the date of the final judgment of the highest state appellate court to which an appeal is taken, whichever date is later.

During times in which the power to delay the intake of inmates is invoked pursuant to this part, a judge may order the sheriff to take the inmate into local custody to await removal to the department in accordance with this part.

Any delay in the commitment of an inmate to the department as authorized by this part shall not affect the finality of the trial court's sentencing order for appellate purposes. During the authorized delay, the trial court shall retain full authority to change the sentence imposed in any manner.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, during the time that the power of restricted intake has been invoked pursuant to § 41-1-504(a)(2), no sheriff may convey an inmate to the department unless authorized to do so by this section. No sheriff shall be deemed to have violated any duty of office by not conveying the inmate when notified to do so.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 19; 1996, ch. 675, § 39.

Law Reviews.

Life-Without-Parole: An Alternative to Death or Not Much of a Life at All?, 43 Vand. L. Rev. 529 (1990).

41-1-507. Governor's report to legislative committees and attorney general and reporter.

Each month or part of a month that a state of prison overcrowding exists that results in the invocation of powers authorized by this part, the governor shall transmit to the state and local government committee of the senate, the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections, and the attorney general and reporter the following information on any inmates who were granted early parole or whose commitment was delayed:

The number of inmates in each category;

The distribution of offenses for which inmates in each category were convicted;

The length of sentences of inmates in each category;

The amount of time served by inmates granted early parole;

The amount of time inmates granted early parole were released prior to regular parole eligibility or release classification dates; and

Any other information concerning early releases on parole or delayed commitments that may be requested by the state and local government committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections.

Within thirty (30) days of the end of a state of prison overcrowding emergency, the governor shall also transmit a summary of the information listed in this section to the officials listed in this section. The summary shall be applicable to all inmates granted early parole or whose commitment was delayed during the most recent state of prison overcrowding emergency.

The commissioner shall report to the state and local government committee of the senate and the state government committee of the house of representatives the number of early releases by primary offense whenever inmates are granted early parole under this part.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §§ 19, 51; 1998, ch. 1049, § 55; 2011, ch. 410, § 2(c); 2012, ch. 925, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 236, § 64; 2019, ch. 345, § 64; 2020, ch. 711, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Acts 2012, ch. 727, § 1 amended § 4-3-104, which concerns name changes of departments and divisions, to provide that references to the board of probation and parole, formerly referred to in subsection (c), are deemed references to the board of parole.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections” for “state government committee of the house of representatives” in (a), (a)(6), and (c).

The 2020 amendment, in (c), substituted “commissioner shall report” for “commissioner and the chair of the board of parole shall report monthly and publicly”, substituted “state government committee of the house of representatives” for “committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections”, and added “whenever inmates are granted early parole under this part”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 711, § 11. June 15, 2020.

Law Reviews.

Life-Without-Parole: An Alternative to Death or Not Much of a Life at All?, 43 Vand. L. Rev. 529 (1990).

41-1-508. Release eligibility dates for felons in local institutions.

The percentage reduction of release eligibility dates required under §§ 41-1-503 — 41-1-507 shall likewise apply to all felony offenders serving sentences of one (1) or more years in local jails and workhouses.

Offenders made eligible for parole consideration by subsection (a) may be considered and released on supervised parole by the board.

Upon attainment of ninety percent (90%) of the relevant designated capacity of the state correctional facilities, the release eligibility dates of all such felony offenders remaining in local jails and workhouses shall automatically revert to the dates in existence prior to their reductions under this section.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 19; 1989, ch. 227, § 62.

Cross-References. Probation, paroles and pardons, title 40, ch. 28.

Release eligibility status, calculations, § 40-35-501.

Law Reviews.

Life-Without-Parole: An Alternative to Death or Not Much of a Life at All?, 43 Vand. L. Rev. 529 (1990).

41-1-509. Transfers of inmates.

During any period in which reductions of release eligibility dates are authorized by §§ 41-1-503 — 41-1-507, the department of correction shall make every effort consistent with its classification policies to reduce overcrowding in particular institutions through transfers of inmates to other institutions.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 19.

Law Reviews.

Life-Without-Parole: An Alternative to Death or Not Much of a Life at All?, 43 Vand. L. Rev. 529 (1990).

41-1-510. Participation in time reduction programs.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all prisoners sentenced to the department of correction whose commitments are delayed pursuant to this part or pursuant to the order of a federal court, and who are being held by the county pending the commitment, may, at the discretion of the sheriff or superintendent, participate in appropriate academic, vocational and work-related programs that are available to persons sentenced to local jails or workhouses, and may be awarded time reduction credits as authorized by chapter 2 of this title for participation in the programs.

Acts 1988, ch. 571, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Life-Without-Parole: An Alternative to Death or Not Much of a Life at All?, 43 Vand. L. Rev. 529 (1990).